Connecticut, session 2026, SB00364.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1,
2 2027, the Division of Emergency Management and Homeland Security
3 within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
4 shall (1) develop, in consultation with the Office of the Governor and
5 municipal leaders, (A) standardized extreme hot and cold weather
6 protocols that include, but are not limited to, weather factors, such as
7 temperatures, heat index and wind chill, that will prompt the state and
8 municipalities to require the opening of cooling centers and warming
9 centers throughout the state, and (B) methods for accessing
10 transportation to such centers and communicating such protocols to the
11 public, (2) post such protocols on the division's Internet web site, and
12 (3) provide such protocols to the 2-1-1 Infoline program operated by the
13 United Way of Connecticut.
SB364 / File No. 54 1

SB364 File No. 54
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PH Joint Favorable
SB364 / File No. 54 2

SB364 File No. 54
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various State Agencies GF - Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Explanation
The bill may result in increased costs to the state and municipalities
to the extent the standard protocols required under the bill lead to more
extreme weather activations than under current practice. For context
costs associated with increased activations may include, but are not
limited to, municipalities opening more cooling or warming centers, the
Department of Social Services supporting additional rides for members
via non-emergency medical transportation, and the Department of
Housing supporting hoteling.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the increase in extreme weather
activations.
SB364 / File No. 54 3

SB364 File No. 54
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 364
AN ACT CONCERNING EXTREME WEATHER PROTOCOLS.